src/fst/stems/subjunctions.lexc
!! # Meänkieli subjunctions


LEXICON cs   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+CS: # ;     !!≈ * @CODE@ 

LEXICON Subjunction !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
ette cs ;           !!≈ * @CODE@ 
vaikka cs ;         !!≈ * @CODE@ 
koska cs ;
mutta cs ;
ko cs ;
jos cs ;
että cs ;
kun cs ;
